Vermont statutes. Title 3 Executive
Subchapter 3. Professional Regulation
§ 129.
Powers of boards or of Director in advisor professions; discipline process.

In addition to any other provisions of law, a board or the Director, in the case of professions that have advisor appointees, may exercise the following powers:

Consistent with other law and State policy, develop administrative rules establishing evidence-based standards of practice appropriate to secure and promote the public health, safety, and welfare; open and fair competition within the marketplace for professional services; interstate mobility of professionals; and public confidence in the integrity of professional services.

Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any authorized hearing, investigation, or disciplinary proceeding. Subpoenas may be issued ex parte by the chair of the board, the Director, or any attorney representing a party. Depositions may be taken after charges upon due notice to all parties without specific authorization by the board.

Issue warnings or reprimands, suspend, revoke, limit, condition, deny, or prevent renewal of licenses, after disciplinary hearings or, in cases requiring emergency action, immediately suspend, as provided by section 814 of this title. In a case involving noncompliance with a statute or rule relating to administrative duties not related to patient, client, or customer care, a board or hearing officer may determine that ordering a monetary civil penalty does not constitute a finding of unprofessional conduct.

Reinstate or deny reinstatement of a license that has been revoked, suspended, limited, or conditioned.

Discipline any licensee or refuse to license any person who has had a license application denied or a license revoked, suspended, limited, conditioned, or otherwise disciplined by a licensing agency in another jurisdiction for conduct that would constitute unprofessional conduct in this State, or has surrendered a license while under investigation for unprofessional conduct.

Notify relevant State, federal, and local agencies and appropriate bodies in other states of the status of any disciplinary case against an applicant or licensee, provided the board has taken disciplinary action or has served a notice of charges against the person.

Refuse to accept the return of a license tendered by the subject of a disciplinary investigation or refuse to allow an applicant who is the subject of a disciplinary investigation to withdraw his or her application without permission of the board.

Adopt rules governing the issuance of licenses to practice, to persons licensed and in good standing to practice in another jurisdiction, that authorize the holder of the license to practice in this State for no more than 10 days or 80 hours in any calendar year upon payment of the required fee.

For good cause shown, waive fees when a license is required to provide services on a pro bono basis or in accordance with standards established by the board by rule.

Issue temporary licenses during a declared state of emergency. The person to be issued a temporary license must be:
(10) (A) Issue temporary licenses during a declared state of emergency. The person to be issued a temporary license must be:

currently licensed, in good standing, and not subject to disciplinary proceedings in any other jurisdiction; or

a graduate of an approved education program during a period when licensing examinations are not reasonably available.

The temporary license shall authorize the holder to practice in Vermont until the termination of the declared state of emergency or 90 days, whichever occurs first, provided the licensee remains in good standing, and may be reissued by the board if the declared state of emergency continues longer than 90 days.

Fees shall be waived when a license is required to provide services under this subdivision.

Treat as incomplete any license application submitted with a check subsequently returned for insufficient funds or without the personal attestation of the applicant or an authorized officer of an applicant corporation as to the representations therein.

Waive or modify continuing education requirements for persons on active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces.

Administer a Vermont statutes and rules examination as a condition of licensure, renewal, or reinstatement.

Grant an honorary license to those individuals having demonstrated outstanding service to a profession, at the discretion of the board. An honorary license shall not confer the right or privilege to practice the profession in this State.

A board or the Director, in the case of professions that have advisor appointees, shall receive complaints from any source, or may investigate without receiving a complaint.

Boards and administrative law officers sitting in disciplinary cases shall do so impartially and without ex parte knowledge of the case in controversy.
(c) (1) Boards and administrative law officers sitting in disciplinary cases shall do so impartially and without ex parte knowledge of the case in controversy.

A State prosecuting attorney assigned by the Office shall be responsible for prosecuting disciplinary cases before boards or administrative law officers.

The Office may assign one or more board members or advisors to assist Office investigators and the prosecutor in relation to the investigation and prosecution of licensing and disciplinary matters. If a board member has served in this capacity, the member shall not participate in ex parte communications with other board members regarding the case and shall not participate in deliberating or deciding the case.

A board or the Director shall notify parties, in writing, of their right to appeal final decisions of the board. A board or the Director shall also notify complainants in writing of the result of any disciplinary investigation made with reference to a complaint brought by them to the board or Director. When a disciplinary investigation results in a stipulation filed with the board, the board or the Director shall provide the complainant with a copy of the stipulation and notice of the stipulation review scheduled before the board. The complainant shall have the right to be heard at the stipulation review.

When a board or the Director, in the case of professions that have advisor appointees, intends to deny an application for a license, the board or Director shall send the applicant written notice of the decision by certified mail. The notice shall include a statement of the reasons for the action and shall advise the applicant that the applicant may file a petition within 30 days of the date on which the notice is mailed with the board or the Director for review of its or his or her preliminary decision.
(e) (1) When a board or the Director, in the case of professions that have advisor appointees, intends to deny an application for a license, the board or Director shall send the applicant written notice of the decision by certified mail. The notice shall include a statement of the reasons for the action and shall advise the applicant that the applicant may file a petition within 30 days of the date on which the notice is mailed with the board or the Director for review of its or his or her preliminary decision.

At the hearing, the applicant shall bear the burden of proving that the preliminary denial should be reversed and that the license should be granted.

After the hearing, the board or Director shall affirm or reverse the preliminary denial, explaining the reasons therefor in writing.

The Director may appoint a hearing officer, who shall be an attorney admitted to practice in this State, to conduct a hearing that would otherwise be heard by a board. A hearing officer appointed under this subsection may administer oaths and exercise the powers of the board properly incidental to the conduct of the hearing.
(f) (1) (A) The Director may appoint a hearing officer, who shall be an attorney admitted to practice in this State, to conduct a hearing that would otherwise be heard by a board. A hearing officer appointed under this subsection may administer oaths and exercise the powers of the board properly incidental to the conduct of the hearing.

When disciplinary charges are pending concurrently against a single individual or entity, in one profession or multiple, the Director is authorized to order that the matters be consolidated in a single proceeding.

In board professions, when a hearing is conducted by a hearing officer, the officer shall report findings of fact and conclusions of law to the board. The report shall be made within 60 days of the conclusion of the hearing unless the board grants an extension. The provisions of section 811 of this title regarding proposals for decision shall not apply to the hearing officer report.

The board may take additional evidence and may accept, reject, or modify the findings and conclusions of the hearing officer. Judgment on the findings shall be rendered by the board.

A board may authorize any of the following:

Its chair or Office legal counsel to grant continuances of scheduled hearings.

Its chair to grant or deny stays pending appeal.

An administrative law officer to convene and conduct prehearing conferences and to preside at hearings for the purpose of making procedural and evidentiary rulings. The board may overrule a ruling by an administrative law officer under this subdivision.

Office staff to grant applications that present no substantial discretionary or factual question and to administer the policies of the board between regular meetings.

A board member, hearing officer, or administrative law officer having a personal or pecuniary interest or the appearance of a personal or pecuniary interest in the outcome of any board decision shall not participate in deciding the matter.
(h) (1) A board member, hearing officer, or administrative law officer having a personal or pecuniary interest or the appearance of a personal or pecuniary interest in the outcome of any board decision shall not participate in deciding the matter.

A board member, hearing officer, or administrative law officer whose disqualification is sought shall either disqualify himself or herself or, without ruling on the request for disqualification, refer the request to the Secretary of State, who shall rule on the request.
(2) (A) A board member, hearing officer, or administrative law officer whose disqualification is sought shall either disqualify himself or herself or, without ruling on the request for disqualification, refer the request to the Secretary of State, who shall rule on the request.

The ruling of the Secretary of State on a request for disqualification shall be final and shall be subject to review only upon appeal of a final order of a board under section 130a of this title or of an administrative law officer under subsection (j) of this section.

A board may consult with the Attorney General or an attorney assigned by the Office of Professional Regulation for the proper conduct of its affairs. The Director may assign Office legal counsel to assist a board in the lawful and orderly conduct of its open meetings and other nondisciplinary business, including making procedural and parliamentary rulings.

(j)

Hearings involving denials of licensure or disciplinary matters concerning persons in professions that have advisor appointees shall be heard by an administrative law officer appointed by the Secretary of State.

(k) (1)

Whenever completion of certain continuing education requirements is a condition of renewal, the board may require the applicant to develop and complete a specific corrective action plan, to be completed within 90 days.

(2)

A board may grant a temporary renewal license pending the completion of the required continuing education.

(
l
)

Unless a disciplinary order expressly provides to the contrary, discipline against any license or credential issued by a regulatory body attached to the Office to an individual or entity shall be applicable as a matter of law to all other licenses issued to that licensee by that regulatory body.

(m)

In any proceeding under this section that addresses an applicant’s or licensee’s alleged sexual misconduct, evidence of the sexual history of the victim of the alleged sexual misconduct shall neither be subject to discovery nor be admitted into evidence. Neither opinion evidence of nor evidence of the reputation of the victim’s sexual conduct shall be admitted.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 63;

1993, No. 102

, § 3;

1993, No. 103

, § 3;

1993, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

1995, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1995, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. May 1, 1996;

1995, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. May 15, 1996;

1997, No. 40

, § 4;

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 52

, § 2;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 13, 2002;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 27, 2002;

2003, No. 66

, § 85;

2005, No. 27

, § 4;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 29

, § 1;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2009, No. 35

, § 1;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2011, No. 66

, § 2, eff. June 1, 2011;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2015, No. 38

, § 3, eff. May 28, 2015;

2017, No. 48

, § 3;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2019, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. March 30, 2020;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Oct. 1, 2020;

2021, No. 69

, § 3.

§ 129a.
Unprofessional conduct.

In addition to any other provision of law, the following conduct by a licensee constitutes unprofessional conduct. When that conduct is by an applicant or person who later becomes an applicant, it may constitute grounds for denial of a license or other disciplinary action. Any one of the following items or any combination of items, whether the conduct at issue was committed within or outside the State, shall constitute unprofessional conduct:

Fraudulent or deceptive procurement or use of a license.

Advertising that is intended or has a tendency to deceive.

Failing to comply with provisions of federal or State statutes or rules governing the practice of the profession.

Failing to comply with an order of the board or violating any term or condition of a license restricted by the board.

Practicing the profession when medically or psychologically unfit to do so.

Delegating professional responsibilities to a person whom the licensed professional knows, or has reason to know, is not qualified by training, experience, education, or licensing credentials to perform them, or knowingly providing professional supervision or serving as a preceptor to a person who has not been licensed or registered as required by the laws of that person’s profession.

Willfully making or filing false reports or records in the practice of the profession, willfully impeding or obstructing the proper making or filing of reports or records, or willfully failing to file the proper reports or records.

Failing to make available promptly to a person using professional health care services, that person’s representative, or succeeding health care professionals or institutions, upon written request and direction of the person using professional health care services, copies of that person’s records in the possession or under the control of the licensed practitioner, or failing to notify patients or clients how to obtain their records when a practice closes.

Failing to retain client records for a period of seven years, unless laws specific to the profession allow for a shorter retention period. When other laws or agency rules require retention for a longer period of time, the longer retention period shall apply.

Conviction of a crime related to the practice of the profession or conviction of a felony, whether or not related to the practice of the profession. If an individual has a conviction of concern, the board or hearing officer shall consider the following in determining whether to deny or discipline a license, certification, or registration to the individual based on the following factors:

the nature and seriousness of the conviction;

the amount of time since the commission of the crime;

the relationship of the crime to the ability, capacity, and fitness required to perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of the profession; and

evidence of rehabilitation or treatment.

Failing to report to the Office a conviction of any felony or misdemeanor offense in a Vermont District Court, a Vermont Superior Court, a federal court, or a court outside Vermont within 30 days.

Exercising undue influence on or taking improper advantage of a person using professional services, or promoting the sale of services or goods in a manner that exploits a person for the financial gain of the practitioner or a third party.

Performing treatments or providing services that the licensee is not qualified to perform or that are beyond the scope of the licensee’s education, training, capabilities, experience, or scope of practice.

Failing to report to the Office within 30 days a change of name, e-mail, or mailing address.

Failing to exercise independent professional judgment in the performance of licensed activities when that judgment is necessary to avoid action repugnant to the obligations of the profession.

Impeding an investigation under this chapter or unreasonably failing to reply, cooperate, or produce lawfully requested records in relation to such investigation.
(16) (A) Impeding an investigation under this chapter or unreasonably failing to reply, cooperate, or produce lawfully requested records in relation to such investigation.

The patient privilege set forth in

12 V.S.A. § 1612

shall not bar the licensee’s obligations under this subsection (a) and a confidentiality agreement entered into in concluding a settlement of a civil claim shall not exempt the licensee from fulfilling his or her obligations under this subdivision (16).

Advertising, promoting, or recommending a therapy or treatment in a manner tending to deceive the public or to suggest a degree of reliability or efficacy unsupported by competent evidence and professional judgment.

Promotion by a treatment provider of the sale of drugs, devices, appliances, or goods provided for a patient or client in such a manner as to exploit the patient or client for the financial gain of the treatment provider, or selling, prescribing, giving away, or administering drugs for other than legal and legitimate therapeutic purposes.

Willful misrepresentation in treatments or therapies.

Offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat a disease or disorder by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine.

Permitting one’s name or license to be used by a person, group, or corporation when not actually in charge of or responsible for the professional services provided.

Prescribing, selling, administering, distributing, ordering, or dispensing any drug legally classified as a controlled substance for the licensee’s own use or to an immediate family member as defined by rule.

For any professional with prescribing authority, signing a blank or undated prescription form or negligently failing to secure electronic means of prescribing.

For any mental health care provider, use of conversion therapy as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 8351

on a client younger than 18 years of age.

For providers of clinical care to patients, failing to have in place a plan for responsible disposition of patient health records in the event the licensee should become incapacitated or unexpectedly discontinue practice.

Sexually harassing or exploiting a patient, client, or consumer, or doing so to a coworker in a manner that threatens the health, safety, or welfare of patients, clients, or consumers; failing to maintain professional boundaries; or violating a patient, client, or consumer’s reasonable expectation of privacy.

For a health care practitioner, failing to comply with one or more of the notice, disclosure, or advertising requirements in

18 V.S.A. § 4502

for administering stem cell or stem cell-related products not approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.

Engaging in conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud, or harm the public.

Failure to practice competently by reason of any cause on a single occasion or on multiple occasions may constitute unprofessional conduct, whether actual injury to a client, patient, or customer has occurred. Failure to practice competently includes:

performance of unsafe or unacceptable patient or client care; or

failure to conform to the essential standards of acceptable and prevailing practice.

The burden of proof in a disciplinary action shall be on the State to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the person has engaged in unprofessional conduct.

After hearing, and upon a finding of unprofessional conduct, a board or an administrative law officer may take disciplinary action against a licensee or applicant, including imposing an administrative penalty not to exceed $5,000.00 for each unprofessional conduct violation.
(d) (1) After hearing, and upon a finding of unprofessional conduct, a board or an administrative law officer may take disciplinary action against a licensee or applicant, including imposing an administrative penalty not to exceed $5,000.00 for each unprofessional conduct violation.

Any money received under this subsection shall be deposited in the Professional Regulatory Fee Fund established in section 124 of this chapter for the purpose of providing education and training for board members and advisor appointees.
(2) (A) Any money received under this subsection shall be deposited in the Professional Regulatory Fee Fund established in section 124 of this chapter for the purpose of providing education and training for board members and advisor appointees.

The Director shall detail in the annual report receipts and expenses from money received under this subsection.

In the case where a standard of unprofessional conduct as set forth in this section conflicts with a standard set forth in a specific board’s statute or rule, the standard that is most protective of the public shall govern.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 5; amended

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 27, 2002;

2003, No. 60

, § 2;

2005, No. 27

, § 5;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2009, No. 35

, § 2;

2011, No. 66

, § 3, eff. June 1, 2011;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2017, No. 48

, § 4;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. July 1, 2019;

2019, No. 30

, § 4;

2021, No. 61

, § 2;

2021, No. 69

, § 4;

2021, No. 69

, § 20, eff. June 8, 2021.

Particular cases.

There was no merit to respondent engineer’s contention that unprofessional conduct charges were fundamentally flawed or contrary to public policy when the Office of Professional Regulation decided in its discretion, following an investigation, that charges were warranted and then held a hearing. In re Bombardier, 2018 VT 11, 206 Vt. 450, 182 A.3d 1165, 2018 Vt. LEXIS 8 (2018).

Board of Professional Engineering did not misconstrue the scope of respondent engineer’s undertaking, as respondent testified that he agreed to a very broad undertaking. In re Bombardier, 2018 VT 11, 206 Vt. 450, 182 A.3d 1165, 2018 Vt. LEXIS 8 (2018).

Nursing home administrator could not be subjected to professional discipline and penalties based on deficiencies with the nursing home when the administrative law officer did not specifically find that she was responsible for their occurrence, but instead held her liable on the basis that administrators were charged with general administration of the home and were thus responsible for all that occurred there. Whittington v. Office of Prof'l Regulation, 2013 VT 93, 195 Vt. 181, 87 A.3d 489, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 104 (2013).

No error was found in the administrative law officer’s conclusion that a midwife committed unprofessional conduct by failing to obtain written informed consent forms from her client, either for the home birth or for the special risks associated with a vaginal birth after cesarean. Devers-Scott v. Office of Professional Regulation, 2007 VT 4, 181 Vt. 248, 918 A.2d 230, 2007 Vt. LEXIS 3 (2007).

Evidence of midwife’s visit to a client’s home in New York, which included taking the client’s blood pressure and fetal heart tones, supported the administrative law officer’s (ALO’s) finding that she practiced midwifery in New York in violation of New York law. Therefore, the ALO did not err in concluding that she violated the statute listing as unprofessional conduct the failure to comply with provisions of federal or state statutes or rules governing the practice of the profession. Devers-Scott v. Office of Professional Regulation, 2007 VT 4, 181 Vt. 248, 918 A.2d 230, 2007 Vt. LEXIS 3 (2007).

Midwife failed in her argument that, because the conditions her client presented were not explicitly listed as triggers for a physician consultation in the midwifery rule, there was no support for the administrative law officer’s (ALO) conclusion that she should have consulted a physician. However, the ALO did not conclude that she violated the rule in this instance. Instead, the ALO reasonably concluded that, under the particular circumstances the client presented, the statute pertaining to the failure to practice competently required that a midwife, “in the exercise of caution and in providing competent and safe patient care
.
.
. make the assumption that a full rupture of the amniotic membrane [has] occurred
.
.
. [because t]he risks of making the opposite assumption
.
.
. are simply too high.” Devers-Scott v. Office of Professional Regulation, 2007 VT 4, 181 Vt. 248, 918 A.2d 230, 2007 Vt. LEXIS 3 (2007).

§ 129b.
Board member and advisor appointments.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary relating to terms of office and appointments for members of boards attached to the Office of Professional Regulation, all board members appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for staggered five-year terms and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. Appointments under this section shall not be subject to the advice and consent of the Senate. The Governor may remove any member of a board as provided in section 2004 of this title. Vacancies created other than by expiration of a term shall be filled in the same manner that the initial appointment was made for the unexpired portion of the term. Terms shall begin on January 1 of the year of appointment and run through December 31 of the last year of the term. The Governor may request nominations from any source but shall not be bound to select board members from among the persons nominated. As provided in section 2004 of this title, board members shall hold office and serve until a successor has been appointed.

Board members shall not serve more than two consecutive terms. Members appointed to fill a vacancy created before the end of a term shall not be deemed to have served a term for purposes of this section.

Boards shall meet annually, in September or the first meeting scheduled thereafter, to elect a chair, vice chair, and secretary.

Meetings may be called by the chair or shall be called upon the request of any other two board members.

Meetings shall be warned and conducted in accordance with 1 V.S.A. chapter 5, the Open Meeting Law.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, board members and advisors for all professions attached to the Office of Professional Regulation shall be entitled to compensation, at a rate provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

, for performance of official duties and other duties directly related to the efficient conduct of necessary business of a board or the Office.

For advisor professions:

Advisors shall be appointed by the Secretary of State and shall serve at the pleasure of the Secretary of State. Advisor appointments shall be subject to the same conditions as those for board members under this section.

The Office shall warn and conduct an open meeting including advisors, program staff, and interested members of the public:

at least once per year for each profession with 500 or fewer active licensees; and

at least twice per year for each profession with more than 500 active licensees.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 6; amended

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 5;

2005, No. 27

, § 6;

2007, No. 29

, § 2;

2019, No. 30

, § 5.

§ 130.
Repealed. 1989, No. 250 (Adj. Sess.), § 91(a).

§ 130a.
Appeals.

A party aggrieved by a final decision of a board or administrative law officer may, within 30 days of the decision, appeal that decision by filing a notice of appeal with the Director who shall assign the case to an appellate officer.
(a) (1) A party aggrieved by a final decision of a board or administrative law officer may, within 30 days of the decision, appeal that decision by filing a notice of appeal with the Director who shall assign the case to an appellate officer.

The review shall be conducted on the basis of the record created before the board or administrative law officer.
(2) (A) The review shall be conducted on the basis of the record created before the board or administrative law officer.

In cases of alleged irregularities in procedure before the board or administrative law officer, not shown in the record, proof on that issue may be taken by the appellate officer.

The appellate officer shall not substitute his or her judgment for that of the board or administrative law officer as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The appellate officer may affirm the decision, or may reverse and remand the matter with recommendations if substantial rights of the appellant have been prejudiced because the board’s or administrative law officer’s finding, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

in violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

in excess of the statutory authority of the board or administrative law officer;

made upon unlawful procedure;

affected by other error of law;

clearly erroneous in view of the evidence on the record as a whole;

arbitrary or capricious; or

characterized by abuse of discretion or clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion.

A party aggrieved by a decision of the appellate officer may appeal to the Supreme Court, which shall review the matter on the basis of the records created before the board or administrative law officer and the appellate officer.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. Feb. 16, 1994; amended

2015, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2017, No. 48

, § 5.